dev/determiner/determiner.ne.dix
  <!-- उपरोक्त; उपरोक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपरोक्त__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जती; जती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जती__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जसो; जसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जसो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यक्ति; त्यक्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यक्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्; जस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कसो; कसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कसो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकअर्क; एकअर्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकअर्क__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्को; अर्क; 3 -->
    <pardef n="अर्क/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेस्; तेस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यै; यै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यो; यो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उनि; उनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उनि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यी; यी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उस्तै; उस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इनै; इनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस; जस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस; यस; 2 -->
    <pardef n="यस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यि; यि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उस; उस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जुन्; जुन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जुन्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेसै; तेसै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेसै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कस्को; कस्को; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कस्को__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उन; उन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जब; जब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जब__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कस्तो; कस्त; 5 -->
    <pardef n="कस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-कस्ता</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कतिपय; कतिपय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कतिपय__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ति; ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ऊ; ऊ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ऊ__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उ; उ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उ__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज-जस; ज-जस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज-जस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यै; त्यै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यत्ति; यत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यत्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यो; त्यो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दोहोरो; दोह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दोह/ोरो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>ोरो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यस्तै; त्यस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यस्तो; त्यस्त; 2 -->
    <pardef n="त्यस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उसो; उसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उसो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जश्; जश्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जश्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="उपरोक्त"><i>उपरोक्त</i><par n="उपरोक्त__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जती"><i>जती</i><par n="जती__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जसो"><i>जसो</i><par n="जसो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यक्ति"><i>त्यक्ति</i><par n="त्यक्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्"><i>जस्</i><par n="जस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसो"><i>कसो</i><par n="कसो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="एकअर्क"><i>एकअर्क</i><par n="एकअर्क__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्को"><i>अर्क</i><par n="अर्क/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तेस्"><i>तेस्</i><par n="तेस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यै"><i>यै</i><par n="यै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यो"><i>यो</i><par n="यो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उनि"><i>उनि</i><par n="उनि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यी"><i>यी</i><par n="यी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उस्तै"><i>उस्तै</i><par n="उस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="इनै"><i>इनै</i><par n="इनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस"><i>जस</i><par n="जस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस"><i>यस</i><par n="यस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यि"><i>यि</i><par n="यि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उस"><i>उस</i><par n="उस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन्"><i>जुन्</i><par n="जुन्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तेसै"><i>तेसै</i><par n="तेसै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्को"><i>कस्को</i><par n="कस्को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उन"><i>उन</i><par n="उन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जब"><i>जब</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्तो"><i>कस्त</i><par n="कस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कतिपय"><i>कतिपय</i><par n="कतिपय__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ति"><i>ति</i><par n="ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊ"><i>ऊ</i><par n="ऊ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उ"><i>उ</i><par n="उ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ज-जस"><i>ज-जस</i><par n="ज-जस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यै"><i>त्यै</i><par n="त्यै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यत्ति"><i>यत्ति</i><par n="यत्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यो"><i>त्यो</i><par n="त्यो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="दोहोरो"><i>दोह</i><par n="दोह/ोरो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस्तै"><i>त्यस्तै</i><par n="त्यस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस्तो"><i>त्यस्त</i><par n="त्यस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उसो"><i>उसो</i><par n="उसो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जश्"><i>जश्</i><par n="जश्__det"/></e>
